District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.15

Reinstatement of expired license.

(a)

If a person fails for any reason to renew the license, certificate, or registration prior to expiration, the Mayor shall reinstate the license, certificate, or registration if the person:

(1)

Applies to the board for reinstatement within 5 years after the license, certification or registration expires;

(2)

Complies with current requirements for renewal of a license, certification or registration;

(3)

Pays a reinstatement fee established by the Mayor; and

(4)

Submits to the board satisfactory evidence of compliance with the qualifications and requirements established under this subchapter for reinstatements.

(b)

The Mayor shall not reinstate the license, certification, or registration of a person who fails to apply for reinstatement within 5 years after the license, certification or registration expires. Such person may become licensed, certified, or registered only by meeting the requirements for obtaining an initial license, certification, or registration under this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.15.